LexC.seemode/Contents/Resources/NewTemplate.lexc
!! # Adjective stems

LEXICON Adjective

 adjdivvun ATTR_0 ;
 tjearoske+Sem/Dummytag:tjearosk Ce_CE_ODDNOCOMP ;
 aareske+Sem/Dummytag:aaresk Ce_CE_ODDNOCOMP "steinete" ;

!! # Adjective inflection

LEXICON Ce_CE_ODDNOCOMP
 +A+Abs: # ;      !!≈ * **@CODE@** - Short form
 +A+Rfx:%>áng # ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** - Long form

LEXICON ATTR_0
 +Attr: # ;
